Tennessee, session 114, HB1424.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Chapter 67 of the Private Acts of 1953, as amended by Chapter 53 of the
Private Acts of 2016, and any other acts amendatory thereto, is amended by deleting from
Article VI, Section 2a the language "All officers of the city, except the city attorney, shall devote
all of their time to their respective offices.".
SECTION 2. This act shall have no effect unless it is approved by a two-thirds (2/3) vote
of the legislative body of the City of Gallatin. Its approval or nonapproval shall be proclaimed by
the presiding officer of the legislative body and certified to the secretary of state.
SECTION 3. For the purpose of approving or rejecting the provisions of this act, it shall
be effective upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it. For all other purposes, it shall
become effective as provided in Section 2.
HB1424
001360
- 1 -